nl: Decoratie techniek: Appliqué; Direct-to-garment (DTG); Borduurwerk; Heat transfer vinyl (HTV); Patch; Strass; Zeefdruk; Sublimatie; Tie-dye; Overige
fi: Koristelutekniikka: Applikointi; Suoratulostus vaatteeseen (DTG); Kirjonta; Lämpösiirtovinyyli (HTV); Kangasmerkki; Strassi; Silkkipaino; Sublimaatio; Solmuvärjäys; Muu
ko: 장식 기법: 아플리케; 의류 직접 인쇄(DTG); 자수; 열전사 비닐(HTV); 패치; 라인스톤; 스크린 인쇄; 승화; 타이다이; 기타
el: Τεχνική διακόσμησης: Απλικέ; Απευθείας στο ρούχο (DTG); Κέντημα; Βινύλιο μεταφοράς θερμότητας (HTV); Μπάλωμα; Στρας; Μεταξοτυπία; Εξάχνωση; Tie-dye; Άλλο
sk-SK: Technika dekorácie: Aplikácia; Priamo na odev (DTG); Výšivka; Nažehľovacia fólia (HTV); Nášivka; Kamienky; Sieťotlač; Sublimácia; Batikovanie; Iné
sv: Dekorationsteknik: Applikation; Direkt till klädesplagg (DTG); Broderi; Värmeöverföringsvinyl (HTV); Tygmärke; Strass; Screentryck; Sublimering; Batik; Övrigt
da: Dekorationsteknik: Applikation; Direct to Garment (DTG); Broderi; Heat transfer-vinyl (HTV); Stofmærke; Rhinesten; Serigrafi; Sublimering; Tie-dye; Andet
cs: Technika dekorace: Aplikace; Přímý potisk (DTG); Výšivka; Nažehlovací fólie (HTV); Nášivka; Kamínky; Sítotisk; Sublimace; Batikování; Jiné
sl-SI: Tehnika okraševanja: Aplikacija; Neposredno na oblačilo (DTG); Vezenje; Toplotni prenos folije (HTV); Našitek; Okrasni kamni; Sitotisk; Sublimacija; Tie-dye; Drugo
it: Tecnico decoratore: Applicazione; Stampa diretta su tessuto (DTG); Ricamo; Vinile a trasferimento termico (HTV); Toppa; Strass; Serigrafia; Sublimazione; Tie-dye; Altra
ja: 装飾技法: アップリケ; ガーメントプリント (DTG); 刺繍; 熱転写ビニール (HTV); パッチ; ラインストーン; スクリーンプリント; 昇華プリント; 絞り染め; その他
zh-CN: 装饰工艺: 贴布绣; 成衣直喷 (DTG); 刺绣; 热转印刻字膜 (HTV); 贴片; 烫钻; 丝网印刷; 热升华; 扎染; 其他
vi: Kỹ thuật trang trí: Thêu đắp nổi; In trực tiếp lên vải (DTG); Thêu; In chuyển nhiệt (HTV); Đính miếng đắp; Đính đá; In lụa; In thăng hoa; Nhuộm tie-dye; Khác
ru: Техника декорирования: Аппликация; Прямая печать на ткани (DTG); Вышивка; Термотрансферная пленка (HTV); Нашивка; Стразы; Шелкография; Сублимация; Тай-дай; Другое
hr-HR: Tehnika ukrašavanja: Aplikacija; Izravno na odjeću (DTG); Vez; Termoprijenosni vinil (HTV); Prišivak; Cirkon; Sitotisak; Sublimacija; Tie-dye; Ostalo
fr: Technique de décoration: Appliqué; Impression directe sur vêtement (DTG); Broderie; Vinyle de transfert thermique (HTV); Écusson; Strass; Sérigraphie; Sublimation; Tie-dye; Autre
pt-PT: Técnica de decoração: Aplique; Direto no tecido (DTG); Bordado; Vinil de transferência térmica (HTV); Patch; Strass; Serigrafia; Sublimação; Tie-dye; Outro
lt-LT: Dekoravimo technika: Aplikacija; Tiesioginė spauda ant audinio (DTG); Siuvinėjimas; Terminė plėvelė (HTV); Antsiuvas; Dekoratyviniai akmenukai; Šilkografija; Sublimacija; Batikavimas; Kita
zh-TW: 裝飾技法: 貼花; 數位直噴 (DTG); 刺繡; 熱轉印膠膜 (HTV); 貼片; 水鑽; 網版印刷; 熱昇華; 紮染; 其他
de: Dekorationstechnik: Applikation; Direct-to-Garment (DTG); Stickerei; Textiltransferfolie (HTV); Aufnäher; Strass; Siebdruck; Sublimation; Tie-Dye; Sonstige
ro-RO: Tehnica de decorare: Aplicație; Direct pe îmbrăcăminte (DTG); Broderie; Vinil prin transfer termic (HTV); Petic; Stras; Serigrafie; Sublimare; Tie-dye; Altele
hu: Dekorációs technika: Rátét; Közvetlen ruhamyomtatás (DTG); Hímzés; Vasalható fólia (HTV); Folt; Strasszkő; Szitanyomás; Szublimáció; Batikolás; Egyéb
tr: Dekorasyon tekniği: Aplike; Doğrudan giysiye baskı (DTG); Nakış; Isı transfer folyosu (HTV); Yama; Yapay elmas; Serigrafi baskı; Süblimasyon; Batik; Diğer
pt-BR: Técnica de decoração: Aplique; Direto na peça (DTG); Bordado; Vinil termocolante (HTV); Patch; Strass; Serigrafia; Sublimação; Tie-dye; Outra
th: เทคนิคการตกแต่ง: งานปะติดผ้า; พิมพ์ลงบนผ้าโดยตรง (DTG); งานปัก; รีดร้อนด้วยไวนิล (HTV); อาร์มรีดติดเสื้อ; พลอยเทียม; สกรีน; พิมพ์ซับลิเมชัน; มัดย้อม; อื่นๆ
en: Decoration technique: Appliqué; Direct to garment (DTG); Embroidery; Heat transfer vinyl (HTV); Patch; Rhinestone; Screen printing; Sublimation; Tie-dye; Other
pl: Technika zdobienia: Aplikacja; Druk bezpośredni (DTG); Haft; Folia termotransferowa (HTV); Naszywka; Cyrkonie; Sitodruk; Sublimacja; Tie-dye; Inne
es: Técnica de decoración: Aplique; Directo a la prenda (DTG); Bordado; Vinilo de transferencia térmica (HTV); Parche; Pedrería; Serigrafía; Sublimación; Tie-dye; Otro
nb: Dekorasjonsteknikk: Applikasjon; Direkte på plagg (DTG); Broderi; Varmepressevinyl (HTV); Lapp; Rhinestone; Silketrykk; Sublimering; Knytebatikk; Annet
bg-BG: Техника на декорация: Апликация; Директен печат (DTG); Бродерия; Термотрансферно фолио (HTV); Нашивка; Кристали; Ситопечат; Сублимация; Тай-дай; Друго